Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-751
Rules and regulations; violations; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to violate any rule or regulation prescribed and promulgated by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to authority granted by sections 54-701 to 54-753 and 54-7,105 to 54-7,108, and any person so offending shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor for the first violation and a Class I misdemeanor for any subsequent violation.

Laws 1927, c. 12, art. VIII, § 10, p. 94;

C.S.1929, § 54-947;

R.S.1943, § 54-751;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 22.

Exoctic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.

Word knowingly must be interpolated into administrative regulations. R. D. Lowrance, Inc. v. Peterson, 185 Neb. 679, 178 N.W.2d 277 (1970).